Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1264.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 90ACONSUMER GAS TAX RELIEFSec.90A01. Scope of chapter.90A02. Definitions.90A03. Consumer gas tax relief.90A04. Commonwealth indebtedness.§ 90A01. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to consumer gas tax relief.§ 90A02. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the 12345678910111213141516171819 context clearly indicates otherwise:"Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act." The act of February 9, 1999 (P.L.1, No.1), known as the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act."Capital project." A capital project that:(1) is specifically itemized in accordance with the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act pursuant to section 7(a)(4) of Article VIII of the Constitution of Pennsylvania; and(2) is an infrastructure project for highway or bridge maintenance or construction.§ 90A03. Consumer gas tax relief.(a) Reduction.--Notwithstanding Chapters 90 (relating to liquid fuels and fuels tax) and 95 (relating to taxes for highway maintenance and construction), the tax imposed under section 9004(b) and (d) (relating to imposition of tax, exemptions and deductions) shall be reduced by 100% from the rate of the tax imposed on the effective date of this subsection.(b) Applicability.--The reduction under subsection (a) shall apply for 60 days beginning on the effective date of this subsection.§ 90A04. Commonwealth indebtedness. The maximum principal amount of additional debt to be incurred under this section shall be $435,000,000. Debt shall be incurred in accordance with the Capital Facilities Debt Enabling Act, and the Motor License Fund shall be charged with the repayment of the debt. The net proceeds from the sale of obligations authorized in this section are appropriated to the department to be used exclusively to defray financial costs of capital projects during the period under section 90A03(b) 20260SB1264PN1630 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to consumer gas tax relief) . The money necessary to pay debt service or to pay arbitrage rebates required under section 148 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (Public Law 99-514, 26 U.S.C. § 148) due on the obligations under this section is appropriated to the State Treasurer from the Motor License Fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260SB1264PN1630 - 3 - 1234567